Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1727
Income withholding
notice; modification or revocation; notice.

(1)
An income withholding notice may be modified or revoked by a court of competent
jurisdiction or by the county attorney, the authorized attorney, or the department
as a result of a review conducted pursuant to sections 43-512.12 to 43-512.18.
An income withholding notice may also be modified or revoked by a court of
competent jurisdiction, for other good cause shown, after notice and a hearing
on the issue. An income withholding notice may also be modified or revoked
by the county attorney, the authorized attorney, or the department as provided
in subsection (2) of this section or for other good cause. Payment by the
obligor of overdue support or
any monetary judgment, other than through income withholding,
after receipt of notice of income withholding shall not by itself constitute
good cause for modifying or revoking an income withholding notice.

(2) When income withholding has been implemented and, as
a result, a support delinquency has been eliminated, the Title IV-D Division
or its designee shall notify the county attorney, the authorized attorney,
or the department. Upon receipt of such notification, the county attorney,
the authorized attorney, or the department shall modify the income withholding
notice to require income withholding for current support and
any monetary judgments and shall notify the employer or other
payor of the change in the same manner as provided in section 43-1723.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 47;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 36;

Laws 1991, LB 715, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 16;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 25;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 38.